New Jersey, session 222, A4354.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    An institution of higher education shall provide a student with a disability access to assistive services during class for purposes of recording course material, including note-taking software or a scribe, provided that use of any recording is limited for personal use. As used in this section, course material shall not include any test or graded assignment completed during class time. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.